Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2765YH (3) 91 nls/ko H.F. 601 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 533C.1004 Wire transmission fees. 1 1. For purposes of this section, âwire transmissionâ means 2 money transmission by wire including transmission within this 3 country or to or from locations abroad. 4 2. In addition to any other fee required by law for a wire 5 transmission, a licensee or the licenseeâs authorized delegate 6 shall collect from a customer a fee of five dollars for each 7 wire transmission equal to or less than five hundred dollars, 8 and in addition to such fee, if applicable, an amount equal to 9 two percent of the amount of the wire transmission in excess 10 of five hundred dollars. 11 3. The fees collected under subsection 2 shall be remitted 12 quarterly by the licensee or the licenseeâs authorized 13 delegate to the department of revenue in the form and manner 14 prescribed by the department of revenue, in consultation with 15 the department of public safety. All required forms and 16 remittances shall be filed with the department of revenue no 17 later than the fifteenth day of the month following the close 18 of each calendar quarter. 19 4. The department of revenue shall account for all fees 20 remitted under subsection 3 and pay over the same to the office 21 to combat human trafficking established in section 80.45. 22 5. A licensee and the authorized delegate of a licensee 23 furnishing money transfer services shall post a notice, in the 24 form and manner prescribed by the department of public safety, 25 that notifies customers that upon filing an individual income 26 tax return with a valid social security number or a valid 27 taxpayer identification number, the customer shall be entitled 28 to an individual income tax credit equal to the amount of wire 29 transmission fees paid by the customer during the tax year. 30 6. a. The department of revenue, in consultation with the 31 department of public safety, shall enforce the provisions of 32 this section. 33 b. If a licensee or licenseeâs authorized delegate fails 34 to comply with subsection 3, the department of revenue shall 35 -1- LSB 2765YH (3) 91 nls/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 601 notify the superintendent who may suspend or revoke the 1 licenseeâs license under section 533C.901, and may issue an 2 order suspending or revoking the designation of an authorized 3 delegate under section 533C.902. Notification of a suspension 4 under this paragraph shall be delivered to the commissioner of 5 public safety. 6 c. Upon request by the department of revenue, the 7 superintendent may file a claim against the surety bond of the 8 licensee on behalf of the state. 9